Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4005.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. (1) The first Saturday of October of each year through the end of the Sunday
of the following weekend is designated as Water Professionals Appreciation Week.
(2) The purpose of the designation is to:
(a) Encourage public water agencies and wastewater agencies to offer tours, open houses
and other events to educate Oregonians on the important functions of those agencies; and
(b) Encourage all Oregonians to learn about the water and wastewater industries in
Oregon and consider careers in this critical field.
SECTION 2. This 2026 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2026
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House February 10, 2026 Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Approved:
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
........................M.,........................................................., 2026
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Passed by Senate February 25, 2026
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
.................................................................................. ........................M.,........................................................., 2026
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-A) Page 2